Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1182.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-701.05, to read: START_STATUTE15-701.05. Instruction on underrepresented communities; definition A. A school district or charter school may incorporate into the school district's or charter school's minimum course of study, in the area of social studies or into one or more existing courses on civics, United States history or Arizona history, historically accurate instruction on the history, contributions and civic participation of communities that have been historically underrepresented. B. For the purposes of this section, "communities that have been historically underrepresented" includes Asian American, Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander communities. END_STATUTE